Hawaii statutes.
[§432D-16] Summary orders and supervision. (a)
Whenever the commissioner determines that the financial condition of any health
maintenance organization is such that its continued operation might be
hazardous to its enrollees, creditors, or the general public, or that it has
violated any provision of this chapter, the commissioner, after notice and
hearing, may order the health maintenance organization to take such action as
may be reasonably necessary to rectify such condition or violation, including but
not limited to one or more of the following:

(1) Reducing the total amount of present and
potential liability for benefits by reinsurance or other method acceptable to
the commissioner;

(2) Reducing the volume of new business being
accepted;

(3) Reducing expenses by specified methods;

(4) Suspending or limiting the writing of new
business for a period of time;

(5) Increasing the health maintenance organization's
capital and surplus by contribution; or

(6) Taking such other steps as the commissioner may
deem appropriate under the circumstances.

(b) For purposes of this section, the
violation by a health maintenance organization of any law of this State to
which such health maintenance organization is subject shall be deemed a
violation of this chapter.

(c) The commissioner is authorized, by rule,
to set uniform standards and criteria for early warning that the continued
operation of any health maintenance organization might be hazardous to its
enrollees, creditors, or the general public and to set standards for evaluating
the financial condition of any health maintenance organization, which standards
shall be consistent with the purposes expressed in subsection (a).

(d) The remedies and measures available to the
commissioner under this section shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of,
the remedies and measures available to the commissioner under the provisions of
article 15 of chapter 431. [L 1995, c 179, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next